Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 1. Administration.

Administrative Code. —

For office of the commissioner, see 2 AAC 05.

For sale of surplus property, see 2 AAC 20.

Sec. 37.05.010.
Bond of commissioner of administration.

The commissioner of administration, before entering upon official duties, shall execute a good and sufficient bond in the sum of $10,000 payable to the state, conditioned upon the faithful performance of duties imposed by law.
The premium on each bond shall be paid in the same manner as other expenses of the department.

History.

(§ 8 art I ch 82 SLA 1955)

Collateral references. —

63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Funds, § 1 et seq.

72 Am. Jur. 2d, States, Territories, and Dependencies, §§ 80-88.

81A C.J.S., States, §§ 245, 322 et seq.

Sec. 37.05.020.
Regulations.

The Department of Administration shall adopt regulations for the performance of its powers or duties, the execution of its business, and its relations to and business with other state agencies.

History.

(§ 9 art I ch 82 SLA 1955)

Administrative Code. —

For state internal auditor, see 2 AAC 5, art. 2.

For purchasing, see 2 AAC 15.

For sale of surplus property, see 2 AAC 20.

For grant administration, see 2 AAC 45.

For net profit share leasing, see 11 AAC 83, art. 2.

Sec. 37.05.030.
Financial reports and statements. [Repealed, § 19 ch 6 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 37.05.035.
Annual state loan reports.

Each state agency that makes or purchases a loan shall prepare an annual report of the aggregate of all loans, by type, made or purchased by the state agency during the preceding fiscal year. The report must include the estimated rate of interest that would have been charged if the loan had been made or purchased at prevailing market rates and must include the difference between the return on the loan that would have been realized under that estimated rate of interest and the return on the loans under the interest rate actually charged. In the absence of a prevailing market rate in the state, the state agency shall use a rate that, in the judgment of the agency, is comparable to a prevailing market rate. The report must also include an analysis of the income groups benefited under the loan programs. By January 30 of each year the state agency shall notify the legislature that the report prepared under this section is available.

History.

(§ 36 ch 106 SLA 1980; am § 58 ch 21 SLA 1995)

Sec. 37.05.040.
Legal custody of records.

The commissioner has the legal custody of all records, memoranda, writing, entries, prints, representations, or combinations of them, of any act, transaction, occurrence, or event of the department.

History.

(§ 6 art I ch 82 SLA 1955)

Sec. 37.05.050.
Federal funds.

Federal funds received by an agency shall be deposited in the state treasury and disbursed in the same manner as other state money.
Federal funds are subject to the fiscal controls imposed by this chapter, except where federal laws or regulations prevent the funds from being deposited, appropriated, allocated, accounted for, or expended as provided by this chapter and other laws not inconsistent with this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 art VI ch 82 SLA 1955)

Cross references. —

For treatment of the state share of federal receipts from oil and gas leasing in the National Petroleum Reserve, see AS

37.05.530

.

Secs. 37.05.060 — 37.05.120.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 188 SLA 1970.]